Delaware, session 153, HB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Â§ 1911, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1911. Police officers; statewide authority. (c) (1) An on-duty Subject to paragraph (c)(2) of this section, a police officer may arrest upon view and without a warrant at any location within the this State any person when probable cause exists to believe that the person is committing or attempting to commit any crime which creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person or which constitutes a violation of any of the following: a. Â§â4177 of Title 21. Section 4177 of Title 21 (driving under the influence). b. Section 4175 of Title 21 (reckless driving). c. Section 4175A of Title 21 (aggressive driving). d. Section 4166 of Title 21 (overtaking and passing a stopped school bus). (2) A police officer making an arrest under paragraph (c)(1) of this section shall, where acting outside of the officerâs jurisdiction, take reasonable measures to notify the primary jurisdictional police agency as soon as practicable of the location of the crime and, if involving an offense under paragraph (c)(1)a. through (c)(1)d. of this section, the registration number of the vehicle, description of the vehicle, and number of occupants of the vehicle. (d) An âon-dutyâ A police officer may arrest at any location in the this State any person for any offense committed within the jurisdiction of the officerâs employing agency and for whose arrest a warrant has been issued. The âon-dutyâ police officer shall, where acting outside of the officerâs jurisdiction, take reasonable measures to notify the primary jurisdictional police agency of the intended time and place of the execution of the arrest warrant.